Hawaii statutes.
[§321-1.9] Inspections;
visits; state-licensed or state-certified care facilities. [Section
effective July 1, 2019.] (a) The department of health shall conduct
unannounced visits and inspections, including inspections for relicensing or
recertification, for the following state-licensed or state-certified care
facilities on an annual basis and at such intervals as determined by the
department to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of each resident:

(1) Adult day health centers;

(2) Adult day care centers;

(3) Community care foster family homes;

(4) Developmental disabilities domiciliary homes;

(5) Adult foster homes;

(6) Long-term care facilities, including but not
limited to:

(A) Adult residential care homes;

(B) Expanded adult residential care homes;

(C) Assisted living facilities;

(D) Intermediate care facilities;

(E) Nursing facilities; and

(F) Skilled nursing facilities; and

(7) Special treatment facilities.

(b) Unannounced visits may be conducted during
or outside regular business hours. All inspections relating to follow-up
visits, visits to confirm correction of deficiencies, or visits to investigate
complaints or suspicion of abuse or neglect shall be conducted unannounced
during or outside regular business hours. Annual inspections for relicensing
or recertification may be conducted during regular business hours or at
intervals determined by the department. Annual inspections for relicensing or
recertification shall be conducted without notice.

(c) The department shall adopt rules pursuant
to chapter 91 to effectuate the purposes of this section. [L 2016, c 184, §2]

Note

Announced and unannounced visits and unannounced inspections
by the department of health on state-licensed or state-certified care
facilities; reports to 2017-2019 legislature. L 2016, c 184, §8.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next